Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF1003.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 232.102, subsection 1, paragraph c, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: c. (1) A court shall not order placement of a child in a category identified in paragraph âaâ , subparagraph (2), (3), (4), or (5) without a specific finding that placement with an adult relative is not in the childâs best interests and providing reasons for the courtâs finding. (2) Notwithstanding any provision under this subsection to the contrary, if the court finds, during the dispositional hearing, that the child has been placed with an individual licensed under chapter 237 to provide foster care for at least nine months immediately preceding the dispositional hearing, the court shall not order placement of a child in a category identified in paragraph âaâ , subparagraph (1), (2), or (3), House File 1003, p. 2 without a specific finding that such placement is in the childâs best interests and providing reasons for the courtâs findings. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 1003, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor